West Virginia, session 2025, HR1.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia", and state at large the measure proposed.Bill Not to Embrace More Than One Object97. No bill shall embrace more than one object, and that shall be stated in the title, and no law shall be revived or amended by reference to its title only; but the law revived, or the section amended, shall be inserted at large in the new act.Reporting Bills from Committee 98. When a bill is reported from committee with the recommendation that it do pass, it shall be placed on the calendar for the succeeding day and come up on first reading unless the House by action otherwise directs, or an additional committee reference is given by the Speaker. If on the calendar when referred, it shall be replaced on the reading from which it was taken, unless a new bill, in the form of a committee substitute, be reported. In such case, the committee substitute shall be placed on the calendar for the succeeding day and come up on first reading.If a bill be reported favorably with amendments, the report and Journal shall so show, and when the bill reaches second reading the committee amendments shall be acted upon before other amendments are offered, except amendments to the committee amendments.If a committee to which a bill has been referred reports that the same ought not to pass, the Speaker shall immediately propound the question, "Shall the bill be rejected?" If this question is decided in the negative, the bill shall be disposed of in the same manner as if reported favorably.99. Blank.Recommitment of Bills100. A bill may be recommitted at any time before it passes. Should such recommitment take place after its engrossment, and an amendment be reported, the bill shall be placed on second reading when reported back.Reading Bills101. Before any bill is read by the Clerk, he or she shall state to the House whether it is on first, second or third reading.Bills to Have Three Readings102. No bill shall become a law until it has been fully and distinctly read on three different days, unless in case of urgency, by a vote of four fifths of the members present, taken by yeas and nays on each bill, this rule be dispensed with. Upon any bill there may be a motion to dispense with the constitutional rule, in order that the bill may be read twice or three times on the same day, and upon the first or second reading of any bill there may be a motion to dispense with the constitutional rule in order that the bill may, upon such reading, be read by its title: Provided, That in all cases there shall be three readings on each bill, and that an engrossed bill shall be fully and distinctly read.  Bills - First Reading103. The first reading of a bill shall be for information; and if opposition be made to it, the question shall be, "Shall the bill be rejected?" If no opposition be made, or if the question to reject be lost, it shall be regarded as ordered to its second reading, unless the House otherwise specially directs. On the first reading of a bill, it may at any stage of the reading be rejected on motion.Bills - Printing and Availability to Members104. Electronic versions of all bills shall be made available once introduced and printed version of all bills shall be made available when requested from the Legislative Print Shop.Amending and Engrossing Bills105. On the second reading of a bill on the demand of any two members, it shall be read section by section for amendment, and when the amendments as may be moved are disposed of, the question, unless the House otherwise order, shall be, if a House bill, "Shall the bill be engrossed and ordered to the third reading?" If a House bill shall be ordered to its engrossment and third reading, and amendments have been made thereto, the type from which the bill was originally printed shall be changed to conform with the amendments. The bill shall then be reprinted and shall be the engrossed bill, and shall be designated as such. If no amendments are made the bill as originally printed may be ordered to its third reading and shall become the engrossed bill, and shall be designated as such. All House bills ordered to their engrossment and third reading shall be jacketed and engrossed with their number, title, by whom introduced, and if the bill is finally passed, the date of its passage and the signature of the Clerk. If a House bill is passed by the Senate and returned to the House without amendment, or if amended and the amendment or amendments be agreed to, it shall then be turned over to the Joint Committee on Enrolled Bills. In the case of a Senate bill on second reading, if the same be amended by the House and passed as amended, the amendment or amendments shall be attached to the bill at the proper place by the Clerk before the bill is returned to the Senate, and all the amendments shall also appear in the House Journal.Time Bills to Go into Effect106. In the passage of a bill by the House, a motion may be made that it take effect from its passage, or at some time other than ninety days after its passage; and if said motion be adopted by a vote of two thirds of all the members elected to the House, taken by yeas and nays, the Clerk shall communicate that fact to the Senate along with the bill.Senate Bills107. Senate bills passed by the Senate and reported to the House shall be referred to the appropriate committee unless the House otherwise directs. After this they shall be treated in the same manner as House bills.ResolutionsResolutions108. Resolutions shall be of three classes, as follows:(1) Joint Resolutions: All proposed amendments to the State Constitution shall take the form of a joint resolution, which shall be subject to the rules which govern the proceedings on bills, except that it shall be read on three several separate days, and, to be adopted, must on its third reading be agreed to by a two-thirds vote of the members elected to the House. When a proposed amendment to the Constitution is under consideration, the vote of a majority of the members present shall be sufficient to decide an amendment thereto or any collateral or incidental questions thereto short of the final question.(2) Concurrent Resolutions: Concurrent resolutions shall be used for the purpose of expressing the sentiments of the Legislature, for authorizing expenditures incidental to the sessions and business of the Legislature, for agreeing upon adjournments beyond the constitutional limitation, for creating special joint committees, for raising a joint assembly and other inferior and incidental purposes of legislation, and such other purposes as the Legislature may deem proper. The adoption of such resolutions must be concurred in by both houses.(3) House Resolutions: These simple resolutions shall be used for expressing the will or order of the House on matters in which the concurrence of the Senate is not necessary. A House resolution shall be proper to express the sentiments of the body, to authorize expenditures from its contingent fund, for agreeing upon any question, and for all incidental purposes pertaining to the organization and work of the House.Policy of the House as to Concurrent and House Resolutions; Defining Purpose and Scope of Such Resolutions108a. It is hereby declared to be the policy of the House of Delegates that concurrent and House resolutions be limited to the general purposes set forth in subdivisions (2) and (3) of Rule 108 and shall be restricted to expressions of sentiments and actions having a bearing upon matters incident to legislative business and the functioning of the legislative process insofar as possible.Such resolutions shall not embrace congratulatory expressions to individuals, organizations, associations or other entities having no relation to the Legislature or public affairs generally, athletic events, scholastic contests, or any other matter not related to the scope and areas of legislative business: Provided, That this rule shall not bar the introduction of resolutions memorializing deceased members of the Legislature and public officials or commending or congratulating public officials on actions in connection with governmental affairs.Introduction of Resolutions109. All resolutions to be introduced in the House shall be filed with the Clerk. The different classes of resolutions shall be numbered by the Clerk and their title entered in the Journal.Action on Resolutions110. Upon introduction, all resolutions shall be read by their titles and referred to the appropriate committee. Resolutions other than joint resolutions, proposing amendments to the State Constitution, reported from committee shall lie over one day and come up under the eleventh order of business the following legislative day.Joint resolutions proposing amendments to the State Constitution shall be treated as bills and proceedings thereon shall be in accordance with section two, article fourteen of the State Constitution.Resolutions adopted by the Senate and reported to the House shall be subject to the same rule as that governing resolutions introduced in the House.PetitionsPetitions111. All petitions, remonstrances, memorials and other papers addressed to the House shall be filed by the member with the Clerk prior to the convening of the House. When in the regular order of business the time is reached for presenting petitions or any such papers, the Clerk shall read a list of those on file, giving the member's name presenting same and a brief summary of the contents thereof, and the same shall be referred to the committee of the member's selection unless otherwise ordered by the House. Each member, upon filing any such petition, remonstrance or other paper, shall endorse thereon his name, and if not so endorsed it shall not be received. The Journal shall show the name of the member presenting such papers, a brief resume of the contents thereof, and the disposition made of same.AmendmentsFiling of Amendments for Floor Session112. Amendments are to be submitted to the Clerk in writing and a duplicate copy is to be filed electronically.Must Be Germane113. No amendment shall be in order that is not germane to the matter under consideration; and the Speaker, when the question is raised, shall rule as to the admissibility of the proposed amendment.Time for Offering114. Amendments may be offered to any bill or joint resolution and acted upon on their second reading and before they are ordered to their engrossment and third reading. No bill shall be amended on third reading, except by unanimous consent of the members present. Amendments to resolutions other than joint resolutions shall be in order at any time the same are being considered. Committee amendments shall be subject to amendment and shall be disposed of before any other amendments are in order.Reading and Stating115. Amendments shall be read by the Clerk and stated by the Speaker before being acted upon.By Striking Out Enacting Clause116. A motion to amend by striking out the enacting clause of a bill shall have precedence over another motion to amend, and, if carried, the bill or resolution is rejected.Amendment to an Amendment117. A motion to amend a pending amendment may be received, but until it is disposed of no other motion to amend will be in order. But pending such amendment, a motion to amend in the nature of a substitute, and a motion to amend that substitute, may be received, but shall not be voted upon until the original matter is perfected.A committee may report out a committee substitute in the event the committee reports out a bill or resolution with an amendment. Committee counsel may create a committee substitute for a committee substitute.Amendment to Have Precedence Over Substitute118. If a substitute for a bill or resolution be offered, a motion to amend the original bill or resolution shall have precedence.BlankMotion to Amend to Have Precedence Over One to Strike Out119. If a motion be made to strike out part of a bill or resolution, a motion to amend the part proposed to be stricken out shall have precedence.BlankFilling Blanks120. In filling blanks, the largest sum and longest time proposed shall be first put, and the question shall be put on names in the order they were nominated.No Amendment by Way of Rider121. No amendment by way of rider shall be received to any bill. Agreeing to Senate Amendments122. When a House bill or House joint resolution shall be amended by the Senate, the question on agreeing to the bill or resolution as amended shall be again voted on by yeas and nays, and the result entered on the Journal, and in such a case the affirmative vote of a majority of the members elected to the House shall be necessary. Amendment by Section123. If a bill is being considered section by section, only amendments to the section under consideration shall be in order. After all sections have been considered separately, the whole bill shall be open for amendment except that an amendment seeking to strike out matter previously inserted and containing substantially no new proposition shall not be in order.Amending Titles124. After the passage of a bill or joint resolution, amendments to its title may be offered when the title is read for approval.Amendments to Senate Bills125. Any Senate bill or resolution may be amended in the same manner as a House bill or resolution. If a Senate bill or resolution is amended, the same shall be noted by the Clerk on the jacket containing same before it is reported to the Senate.After the reading of a Senate amendment to a House bill or resolution, the question shall be, "Will the House concur in the Senate Amendment?" But it shall be in order to move that the House concur in the Senate amendment with an amendment; or that the House refuse to concur and ask the Senate to recede.If the Senate shall refuse to concur in a House amendment to a Senate bill or resolution, the following motions shall be in order and shall be privileged in the order named: First, That the House recede; Second, That the House refuse to recede and ask for a committee of conference; Third, That the House adhere. Amendments to Be Printed in Journal126. All amendments proposed, unless withdrawn, shall be printed in the Journal.Speaking on Amendments127. On an amendment being moved, a member who has spoken to the main question may speak again to the amendment.JournalClerk to Keep128. The Clerk of the House, under the direction of the Speaker, shall keep a full and correct Journal of the proceedings.Approval and Correction129. When the Journal has been read to the end that any mistake made in the entry may be corrected, if no objection is made, it shall stand approved; but if objection be made, the first question of the House shall be to dispose of the same, and when such objections are disposed of and the Journal corrected, as the House may order, it shall stand as approved.Printing Official Copies130. After the printed Journal has been approved and fully marked for correction, the type from which it was printed shall be changed in accordance therewith. From the type so corrected shall be printed the number of copies required by law for the regular bound volumes of the Journal, which shall be properly indexed. In addition thereto six copies shall be printed on 6x9 heavy weight bond paper, with a certificate at the end thereof, certifying that the same is the Official Journal of the House and the same shall be signed by the Speaker and Clerk. Such printed Journal shall be the official record of the House. They shall be bound in flexible binding, and bear the imprint on the back, "Official Journal of the House of Delegates of West Virginia," with designation of regular or special session, as the case may be, and the year. After being signed by the proper officers, two of these copies shall be retained in the office of the Clerk, and one copy shall be lodged in the office of the Governor, one with the Secretary of State, one with the Department of Archives and History, and one with the Clerk of the Senate.Journal to Be Printed Daily131. It shall be the duty of the Clerk to furnish a copy of each day’s proceedings of the Journal to the Legislative Print Shop. An electronic version of the Journal is to be made available and printed copies are to be available on request prior to the start of the next session. Form and Content of Journal132. The Journal shall be kept and published in minute form so as to show a running account of all proceedings and actions taken. Every written motion, unless it be withdrawn on the same day submitted and before action has been taken thereon, and such other material and matters required by these rules and the joint rules of the Senate and House shall be printed in the Journal. No remarks of members, speeches, newspaper editorials and articles, or other material shall be printed in the daily Journal, except explanations of votes as provided by these rules and such portions of remarks as may be necessary for the record in instances where a member may be called to order for words spoken in debate.The Clerk shall keep and publish an Appendix to the bound and official Journals of each session of the House. There shall be included in the Appendix all remarks of members and other material ordered printed by the House.An address or remarks by a member made on the floor of the House may be printed in the Appendix with the consent of the House only on the request of the Member making such address.Amending or Rescinding Rules133. All propositions to amend or rescind any standing rule or order of the House shall be by resolution and be at once referred, without debate, to the Committee on Rules, and shall be reported therefrom within five legislative days thereafter. Any such resolution may be adopted by a majority vote, a quorum being present.Suspension of Rules134. These rules shall not be suspended, except by a vote of at least two thirds of the members present. Unless there be a unanimous consent for the suspension of rules, the vote shall be determined by yeas and nays.Manual and Rules135. On any question of order or parliamentary practice where the rules of the House or the joint rules of the House and Senate are silent or inexplicit, the precedence of parliamentary authority for the House of Delegates shall be: (1) The Constitution of the State of West Virginia; (2) Mason’s Manual of Legislative Procedure, 2020 Edition; and (3) Jefferson’s Manual and the Digest of the Rules and Practices of the House of Representatives of the United States Congress.Miscellaneous RulesPersons Admitted to the Floor — Members’ Gallery136. No person except members of the Congress of the United States, members of the State Senate, former members of the West Virginia Legislature, the Clerk of the Senate, duly accredited approved representatives of the press, radio and television, and legislative employees engaged in the proper discharge of their duties shall be admitted within the House Chamber while the House is in session. At the convening of the House, the Sergeant-at-Arms shall see that all persons not entitled to the privilege of the floor under this rule retire from the House Chamber.At the direction of the Speaker, the west or center balcony of the House Chamber may be designated "Members’ Gallery" and reserved for guests of members of the House, and admission thereto shall be by pass in such form as may be approved by the Committee on Rules and signed by member issuing the same to a guest.Smoking and Use of Tobacco Products Prohibited136a. Smoking and the use of tobacco products are prohibited in the House Chamber and House galleries during sessions and in House committee rooms during committee meetings. or public hearings.Attire of Persons Admitted to Floor136b. No member of the House or any person who has privileges of the floor, except pages, individuals authorized to be present for special ceremonies, television camera operators, media photographers, sound technicians and maintenance personnel, shall be admitted to the floor of the House Chamber while the House is in session unless properly attired. Minimum standards of dress shall consist of the wearing of a coat, a collared dress shirt, and tie and dress pants by males and the wearing of a suitable dress or an appropriate blouse and skirt or pants suit by females. Jeans or shorts shall not constitute proper attire.Lobbying in the House Chamber137. No person engaged in lobbying, including persons entitled to the privilege of the floor under Rule 136, when engaged in lobbying activities, shall be permitted upon the floor of the House or in the foyer thereto at any time during a session of the Legislature in the House Chamber. If any person not a member while within the House Chamber when the House is in session attempts in any manner whatsoever to influence the vote or opinion of any member upon any subject of legislative consideration, he or she shall be removed from the House Chamber and be debarred therefrom during the remainder of the session. Any employee who shall, at any time, engage in such activity shall be subject to immediate dismissal.Use of electronic communication devices prohibited137a. Unless authorized by the Speaker, no person may use a cell phone to make or receive a call on the House floor during a session. A cell phone or other electronic device may be used in the vestibule of the House Chamber or other locations designated by the Speaker. Members are prohibited from communicating by any means with any person not on the House floor, other than other members of the Legislature or legislative staff, regarding the passage or defeat of any pending legislative matter, while such matter is being debated or considered for passage. News Correspondents and Reporters138. (a) Any person accorded the privilege of the press gallery or press table must shall be a professional journalist employed at a recognized media outlet, or of a recognized press association, who is not engaged in any department of state government, or in any other business, including lobbying or advocacy for or against any matter pending before the Legislature. Seating or access to the designated press tables, galleries or seating areas shall be on a first come first served basis or on any such rotation agreed upon among members of the press. as the Speaker sees fit.(b) All applications An application for admission to the press gallery or press table must media floor privileges shall be made yearly to the Speaker or any such representative a designee as he or she may appoint. Such applications shall state the name and location of the media organization and be signed by the applicant. Temporary one-day passes for admittance may be granted by the Speaker or his or her designee as needed. The Speaker or the representative he or she appoints designee shall reserve the right to refuse the issuance of or to revoke media credentials a correspondent’s card at his or her discretion, in accordance with the published guidelines for media.(c) The Speaker or his or her designee(s) shall verify statements made in such the application, and if the application is approved, they shall issue a correspondent’s card shall be issued.(d) The Correspondents A correspondent, sitting at the press tables, shall take his or her place in the House Chamber before the gavel, may not re-enter the House Chamber and upon leaving may not return to the press tables until the House recesses or is at ease. A correspondent may not visit the members in their seats during the session of the House, and shall abide by such rules and regulations as may be adopted by the House or any of its committees. Failure or refusal to abide by such the rules may result in revocation of press credentials. the correspondent’s card. (e) The correspondent card issued by the Speaker must shall be presented when required by any the Sergeant-at-Arms, Doorkeeper or other employee of the House. It shall not be transferable. The transfer or loan of such the card to anyone shall be followed by its cancellation and the withdrawal of all its privileges from the correspondent so offending media organizations.(f) The gallery, press tables or seating areas allotted to journalists correspondent card holders shall be designated by the Speaker or Chair of the committee using the House Chamber or committee rooms. These areas will be are reserved for the exclusive use of the press, correspondent card holders, and persons a person not holding correspondents’ cards shall not be entitled to admission. thereto.Use of Electronic Communication Devices Prohibited139. Unless authorized by the Speaker, no person may use a cell phone to make or receive a call in the House Chamber during a session. Members are prohibited from communicating by any means with any person not in the House Chamber, other than other members of the Legislature or legislative staff, regarding the passage or defeat of any pending legislative matter, while such matter is being debated or considered for passage.Technical corrections140. Legal counsel may make non-substantive corrections of technical drafting and clerical errors with regard to matters considered and reported upon by the committee, if the corrections do not entail a matter of policy or of law which would be properly addressed and considered by the committee.141. BlankOaths142. The Speaker or Clerk shall have authority to administer any oaths required by the business of the House. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home